California statutes. Education Code
(g) Upon receipt of the application described in subdivision (f), duly approved, and of the statement of opposition, if any, the board of governors shall grant the district exemption for any amount that is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). If the amount is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, the board of governors may grant the district exemption from the requirement for the fiscal year for which the application is made if a majority of all the members of the board of governors finds, in writing, that the district will in fact suffer serious hardship or will have to pay salaries of classroom instructors in excess of those paid by other districts of comparable type and functioning under comparable conditions unless the district is granted an exemption. If the exemption is granted, the designated moneys shall be immediately available for expenditure by the community college district governing board. If no application for exemption is made or exemption is denied, the board of governors shall order the designated amount or amount not exempted to be added to the amounts to be expended for salaries of classroom instructors during the next fiscal year.

(h) The board of governors shall enforce the requirements prescribed by this section, and may adopt necessary rules and regulations to that end. It may require the submission during the college year, by community college district governing boards and county superintendents of schools, of the reports and information as may be necessary to carry out this section.

(i) The board of governors, no later than the 10th calendar day of each year of the Legislature, shall submit to the Legislature a written report on the operation, effect, and the extent of compliance with this section by community college districts in the state during the two most recently ended fiscal years. The report shall describe the activities of the board of governors and the chancellor’s office, undertaken to ensure compliance with this section, and may contain recommendations for legislation pertaining to that subject.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Attendance [84500. - 84501.]

84500.

Attendance shall be recorded and kept according to rules and regulations prescribed by the board of governors, subject to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 679.)
-------------------------------------------

84501.

Commencing with the 1991–92 fiscal year, the term “community college average daily attendance” (ADA) means full-time equivalent student (FTES) as that term is defined by regulations adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Community College Facility Deferred Maintenance and Special Repair Program [84660. - 84660.]

84660.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interests of the people of the State of California to ensure that the facilities of the California Community Colleges are repaired and maintained on a timely basis in order to provide for the safe utilization of these facilities as well as providing for the prevention of further structural damage resulting in more costly repairs. The Legislature recognizes that in many community college districts high operating costs and limited district revenues have combined to restrict the ability of community college districts to provide for the periodic maintenance and timely repair of community college facilities.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that funds be allocated pursuant to the requirements of this chapter to provide for the deferred maintenance and special repair of community college facilities. However, the Legislature recognizes that there may not be sufficient revenues in future years to provide an annual appropriation for the program provided by this chapter. Therefore, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create an annual state obligation to fund this program.

(b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt rules and regulations for the allocation of funds authorized by this chapter for the deferred maintenance and special repair of community college facilities. The adopted rules and regulations shall establish criteria for the ranking of requests for funding by community college districts for funds allocated pursuant to this chapter. The adopted rules and regulations shall require districts to prepare and submit to the board of governors a five-year maintenance plan which includes plans for preventative as well as deferred maintenance in order to be eligible for state funding of deferred maintenance. The adopted rules and regulations shall require recipient districts to provide an amount of district funds equal to the amount of state funds to be allocated for facility deferred maintenance and special repair as a condition for the receipt of state funding, subject to a complete or partial waiver of this requirement by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges based upon a review of the financial condition of the district.

For the purpose of this chapter, “deferred maintenance and special repair” means unusual, nonrecurring work to restore a facility to a safe and continually useable condition for which it was intended.

(c) No community college district shall receive funds pursuant to this chapter unless the district expends at least 12 percent of its current operating budget for ongoing maintenance.

(d) The board of governors may, pursuant to subdivision (b), increase the percentage specified in subdivision (c).

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds received by districts pursuant to this chapter supplement, not supplant, district deferred maintenance funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.8. Equipment Replacement Program [84670. - 84674.]

84670.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people of the State of California to ensure the continuation of the quality of instructional programs in the California Community Colleges. The Legislature recognizes that in many community college districts high operational costs and limited district revenues have combined to restrict the ability of the district to provide for adequate equipment in instructional programs.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that funds be allocated pursuant to the requirements of this chapter to provide for the necessary repair of instructional equipment and the replacement of instructional equipment that is outmoded. It is further the intent of the Legislature that an annual appropriation of state funds be made for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

84671.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt rules and regulations for the allocation of funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, for the acquisition, maintenance, and replacement of equipment as appropriate to maintain or establish a high level of quality in the operation of instructional programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

84672.

Allocations shall not be based on specific projects identified by the districts, except as provided in Section 84673, but on a general allocation formula that, in the judgment of the board of governors, reasonably reflects the needs of districts on a statewide basis. The board of governors shall establish criteria for the allocation of funds under this formula on the basis of its review of districts throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

84673.

(a) The board of governors may withhold up to 20 percent of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, for allocation to specifically identified projects where the board finds that the funds allocated to a district are not sufficient to fund a critically needed instructional equipment expenditure, or that special funding is necessary as a condition of a contribution from private business or industry pursuant to an instructional equipment expenditure.

(b) The board of governors may allocate up to 5 percent of the funds withheld under subdivision (a) for purposes of review and administration costs incurred by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to that subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

84674.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may expend funds allocated under the general allocation formula for any equipment acquisition, maintenance, or replacement necessary to the purposes of this chapter. Equipment expenditures made through funding under this chapter should ensure that students are able to obtain the desired level of knowledge in educational programs leading to their enrollment in four-year educational institutions or, for students in occupational education programs, to obtain the necessary skill and knowledge for entry into the work force.

(b) Each community college district receiving funds under this chapter shall separately account for those funds and may spend the funds only for the purpose or purposes for which they are allocated. These funds may be utilized to obtain equipment by purchase, lease, or lease with an option to purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Community College Apportionment [84750.4. - 84920.]



  ARTICLE 2. Program-Based Funding [84750.4. - 84811.]

84750.4.

(a) (1) The board of governors, in accordance with this section, and in consultation with institutional representatives of the California Community Colleges and statewide faculty and staff organizations, so as to ensure their participation in the development and review of policy proposals, shall develop criteria and standards for the purpose of making the annual budget request for the California Community Colleges to the Governor and the Legislature, and for the purpose of allocating the state general apportionment revenues.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to adopt a formula for general purpose apportionments that encourages access for underrepresented students, provides additional funding in recognition
 of the need to provide additional support for low-income students, rewards colleges’ progress on improving student success metrics, and improves overall equity and predictability so that community college districts may more readily plan and implement instruction and programs.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to determine the amounts appropriated for purposes of this section through the annual Budget Act. This section shall not be construed as limiting the authority of either the Governor to propose, or the Legislature to approve, appropriations for the California Community Colleges programs or purposes.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that for the 2020–21 fiscal year, 70 percent of funding for the Student Centered Funding Formula is for the base allocation provided to districts, 20 percent is for the supplemental allocation provided to districts, and 10 percent is
 for student success allocation provided to districts.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall annually calculate a base allocation, a supplemental allocation, and a student success allocation for each community college district in the state pursuant to this section. This calculation applies only to the allocation of credit revenue. Noncredit instruction, and instruction in career development and college preparation full-time equivalent students (FTES) shall be funded pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively, of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018.

(2) (A) As used in this paragraph, a public safety agency includes, but is not limited to, a fire department, a police department, a sheriff’s office, a
 public agency employing paramedics or emergency medical technicians, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, each community college district with an instructional service agreement with a public safety agency may annually submit a copy of its most up-to-date instructional service agreement to the chancellor’s office for review. If an agreement is renewed or updated it may be submitted to the chancellor’s office at the time it is renewed or updated.

(C) Beginning January 1, 2024, each community college district with an instructional service agreement with a public safety agency may annually submit data to the chancellor’s office on course offerings, student enrollment and FTES, and course completion, including data from the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 academic years.

(D) On or before December 31, 2024, upon review and analysis of the community college district agreements and program data submitted pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the chancellor’s office shall issue a recommendation to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the instructional service agreement FTES apportionment that community college districts are eligible to claim.

(3) For purposes of this section, unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the cost-of-living adjustment shall be the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year.

(c) For purposes of computing the base allocation, the marginal funding rate for credit revenue per FTES shall be as follows:

(1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, three thousand seven hundred twenty-seven dollars ($3,727).

(2) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, four thousand nine dollars ($4,009).

(3) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in paragraph (2) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(d) (1) The base allocation shall be computed for each community college district as follows:

(A) Each community college district
 shall receive a basic allocation based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the community college district that is consistent with the basic allocation formula established by the board of governors pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 as of the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(B) Unless otherwise specified in subparagraph (C), each community college district shall receive an allocation based on credit base revenues associated with funded FTES as computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) at the rate pursuant to subdivision (c).

(C) Notwithstanding the rate in subdivision (c), for community college districts that had higher rates used to calculate their 2017–18 general purpose apportionments, the following rates shall be used to calculate their base allocations:

(i) For
 the 2018–19 fiscal year, as follows:

(I) For Foothill-De Anza Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred forty-five dollars ($3,745).

(II) For Lake Tahoe Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand eight hundred eighteen dollars ($3,818).

(III) For Lassen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred ninety-four dollars ($3,794).

(IV) For Marin Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand two hundred sixty-one dollars ($4,261).

(V) For MiraCosta Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred thirty-four
 dollars ($3,734).

(VI) For San Francisco Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred fifty-six dollars ($3,756).

(VII) For San Jose-Evergreen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred forty-four dollars ($3,744).

(VIII) For Santa Monica Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand seven hundred seventy-six dollars ($3,776).

(IX) For South Orange Community College District, the rate shall be no less than three thousand eight hundred twenty-six dollars ($3,826).

(X) For West Kern Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand nine hundred
 thirty-four dollars ($4,934).

(ii) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, as follows:

(I) For Foothill-De Anza Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand twenty-eight dollars ($4,028).

(II) For Lake Tahoe Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand one hundred seven dollars ($4,107).

(III) For Lassen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand eighty-one dollars ($4,081).

(IV) For Marin Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand five hundred eighty-three dollars ($4,583).

(V) For MiraCosta Community College District,
 the rate shall be no less than four thousand sixteen dollars ($4,016).

(VI) For San Francisco Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand forty dollars ($4,040).

(VII) For San Jose-Evergreen Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand twenty-seven dollars ($4,027).

(VIII) For Santa Monica Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand sixty-two dollars ($4,062).

(IX) For South Orange Community College District, the rate shall be no less than four thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($4,115).

(X) For West Kern Community College District, the rate shall be no less than five thousand three hundred seven
 dollars ($5,307).

(iii) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rates specified in clause (ii) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(2) To calculate the base allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate the three-year rolling average comprised of funded FTES from the current year, the prior year, and the year before the prior year, as follows:

(A) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of annually funded credit FTES from the current year, the prior year, and the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.

(B) (i) In computing the three-year average
 pursuant to subparagraph (A), credit FTES associated with enrollment growth proposed in the annual Budget Act shall be excluded from the three-year average and shall instead be added to the computed three-year rolling average.

(ii) In computing the three-year average pursuant to subparagraph (A), credit FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004 shall be excluded.

(C) The sum of a community college district’s computed three-year FTES rolling average and current year funded FTES growth shall be multiplied by a community college district’s applicable base allocation funding rate pursuant to subdivision (c), or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), as applicable, to compute a community college district’s base allocation.

(D) Community college districts are entitled to the restoration of any reductions in their base allocation due to decreases in FTES during the three years following the initial year of decrease if there is a subsequent increase in FTES.

(E) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the base allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, the sum of funded credit FTES for the 2019–20 fiscal year, as adjusted for shifts in summer enrollment between fiscal years, may be used in place of funded credit FTES for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(F) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for purposes of calculating the base allocation pursuant to this subdivision for the 2026–27 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a community college district’s funded credit FTES shall be the greater of the following:

(i) The three-year rolling average of funded credit FTES calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) The community college district’s current year credit FTES that are eligible for funding pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) In addition to the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), each community college district shall receive an allocation based on credit base revenues associated with funded FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004. FTES generated by students who meet the requirements of
 subdivision (a) of Section 84810.5 and special admit students pursuant to Sections 76002, 76003, and 76004 shall be multiplied by a community college district’s applicable credit revenue rate computed for the 2017–18 fiscal year pursuant to Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018, as adjusted for 2018–19 fiscal year cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments, and adjusted for the changes in the cost-of-living and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(4) The chancellor shall allocate any funding appropriated in the Budget Act for enrollment growth to support the following:

(A) First, for the stated percentage of enrollment growth in the Budget Act and consistent with the growth formula used by the board of governors in the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(B) Second, for the amount
 of uncapped growth attributable to increases in the amount of a community college district’s supplemental allocation.

(C) Third, for the amount of uncapped growth attributable to increases in the amount of a community college district’s student success allocation.

(e) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, a supplemental allocation shall be computed for each community college district based on the total points calculated for each community college district in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The marginal funding rate per point for computing a supplemental allocation shall be as follows:

(A) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, nine hundred nineteen dollars ($919).

(B) For the 2019–20
 fiscal year, nine hundred forty-eight dollars ($948).

(C) (i) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subparagraph (B) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(ii) For the calculation of the supplemental allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(2) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who is a recipient of financial aid under the Federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a) based on headcount data of students in the prior year.

(3) Each community college
 district shall be granted one point for each student who is granted an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, based on headcount data of students in the prior year.

(4) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who receives a fee waiver pursuant to Section 76300, based on headcount data of students in the prior year.

(5) For the purpose of calculating the supplemental allocation, the number of students shall be defined as the number of students served by the community college district.

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Act fully fund increases in the supplemental allocations computed under this section.

(f) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, a student success
 allocation shall be computed for each community college district based on the total points calculated for each community college district in accordance with all of the following:

(1) (A) (i) The marginal funding rate per point for computing student success allocation revenue shall be as follows:

(I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, four hundred forty dollars ($440).

(II) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, five hundred fifty-nine dollars ($559).

(III) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subclause (II) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(ii) (I) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, to calculate the student success allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate a three-year rolling average for each metric described in this paragraph. To compute the three-year average for each metric, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of data for that metric from the prior year, the year before the prior year, and the year before the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.

(II) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the student success allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of subparagraphs (B), (C), (D), (E), and (F), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(B) Each community college district shall be granted, for each student, points for one of the following, with
 the community college district receiving points based on the outcome that would generate the highest number of points and with the points counted only if the student was enrolled in the community college district in the academic year in which the award was granted:

(i) Three points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree or approved baccalaureate degree granted, excluding an associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(ii) Four points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree for transfer degree granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric
 calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(iii) (I) Two points for each chancellor’s office approved credit certificate requiring 18 or more units granted, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(II) Chancellor’s office approved credit certificates requiring 16 or more units granted may be used to compute these points if the chancellor’s office adopts regulations authorizing the approval and issuance of certificates requiring 16 or more units.

(C) Each community college district shall be granted two points for each student who successfully completes both transfer-level mathematics and English courses within the student’s first academic year of enrollment, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric
 calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(D) (i) Each community college district shall be granted one and one-half points for each student who successfully transfers to a four-year university, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(ii) The chancellor’s office may reduce a community college district’s transfer points if a community college district enters into, or expands, a transfer partnership with a private for-profit college that has not demonstrated a track record of providing its students with a baccalaureate degree that leads to a majority of the private for-profit college’s baccalaureate degree program students obtaining a regional living wage within one year of completing their degree program.

(iii) The chancellor’s office may reduce a community college district’s transfer points if a community college district enters into, or expands, a transfer partnership with a private for-profit college that does not meet the qualifications to offer its students federal financial aid.

(iv) (I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the data for this metric shall be compiled using publicly available data on transfer students to in-state private and out-of-state institutions, based upon the definition of transfer students reflected in the Transfer Volume to In-State Private and Out-of-State Baccalaureate Granting Institutions Report from the community college management information system as of January 1, 2019, publicly reported transfer data from the California State University, and publicly reported transfer data from the University of California.

(II) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the data for this metric shall be based upon a student meeting the following criteria:

(ia) The student has an enrollment record in a community college district in the year before the prior year.

(ib) The student has completed 12 or more semester units, or the equivalent, systemwide through the end of the prior year.

(ic) The student does not have an enrollment record systemwide in the prior year.

(id) The student enrolled in a four-year university in the prior year.

(ie) The student has completed 12 or more semester units, or the equivalent, in the community college district in the year before the prior year.

(E) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who successfully completes nine or more career technical education units, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(F) Each community college district shall be granted one point for each student who obtains a regional living wage within one year of community college completion, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(2) (A) (i) Each community college district shall also be granted additional points for an equity component of the student success allocation. The marginal funding per point for the equity component of the student success allocation revenue
 shall be as follows:

(I) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, one hundred eleven dollars ($111).

(II) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, one hundred forty-one dollars ($141).

(III) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, the rate specified in subclause (II) adjusted for changes in the cost-of-living adjustment and other base adjustments in subsequent annual budget acts.

(ii) (I) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, to calculate the equity component of the student success allocation for each community college district, the chancellor’s office shall calculate a three-year rolling average for each metric described in this paragraph. To compute the three-year average for each metric, the chancellor’s office shall compute the sum of data for
 that metric from the prior year, the year before the prior year, and the year before the year before the prior year, and divide the sum by three.

(II) For the calculation of the three-year rolling average for the equity component of the student success allocation for the 2020–21 fiscal year, data from the 2018–19 fiscal year, for purposes of subparagraphs (B) and (C), may be used in place of data from the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(B) Each community college district shall receive points for a student who received a fee waiver pursuant to Section 76300 and generated points for any of the metrics described in paragraph (1), based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A). For each student identified pursuant to this subparagraph, the community college district shall receive the number of points equal to the number of points
 that the community college was granted for that student for each of the metrics described in paragraph (1).

(C) (i) Each community college district shall receive points for a student who received financial aid under the Federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a) and generated points for any of the metrics described in paragraph (1), based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(ii) Each community college district shall receive, for each student identified pursuant to clause (i), points for one of the following, with the community college district receiving points based on the outcome that would generate the highest number of points and with the points counted only if the student was enrolled in the community college district in the academic year in which the award was granted:

(I) Four and one-half points for each chancellor’s office approved associate degree or approved baccalaureate degree granted, excluding an associate degree for transfer granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(II) Six points for each chancellor’s office approved associate for transfer degree granted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745) of Chapter 9.2 of Part 40 of Division 5, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(III) Three points for each chancellor’s office approved credit certificate requiring 16 or more units granted, based on the three-year rolling
 average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(iii) Each community college district shall receive, for each student identified pursuant to clause (i), the number of points equal to the following:

(I) Three points for each student who successfully completes transfer-level mathematics and English courses within the student’s first academic year of enrollment, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(II) Two and one-quarter points for each student who successfully transfers to a four-year university, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(III) One and one-half points for each
 student who successfully completes nine or more career technical education units, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(IV) One and one-half points for each student who obtains a regional living wage within one year of community college completion, based on the three-year rolling average for this metric calculated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Act fully fund increases in the student success allocations computed under this section.

(g) To establish a hold harmless protection for community college districts pursuant to the funding allocation established in this section, a minimum funding level for all community college districts shall be computed as follows:

(1) For the 2018–19 and 2019–20 fiscal years, a level of funding to ensure that all community college districts receive at a minimum the total computational revenue the district received in the 2017–18 fiscal year, defined as a district’s final entitlement for general purpose apportionment based on FTES and the number of colleges and comprehensive centers the district operates.

(2) Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year, and each year thereafter, community college districts shall receive the higher of (A) the funding level determined by the formula established in this section, or (B) the level of funding determined by multiplying the community college district’s new FTES by the associated credit, noncredit, and career development and college preparation rate received by the district in the 2017–18 fiscal year. The level of funding shall be adjusted to include a basic allocation
 based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the district consistent with the basic allocation rates used in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(3) (A) From the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, for the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District, the rates for computing the hold harmless provisions pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be multiplied each year by the cost-of-living adjustment identified in the annual Budget Act and adjusted for increases to FTES. The level of funding for the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District shall be adjusted to include a basic allocation based on the number of colleges and comprehensive centers in the district consistent with the basic allocation rates used in the 2017–18 fiscal year multiplied by the 2018–19 fiscal year cost-of-living adjustment, and adjusted for
 changes in the cost-of-living in subsequent annual budget acts. The intent of these adjustments is to provide the San Francisco Community College District and the Compton Community College District with the greater of the amount that would have been calculated pursuant to the requirements of Section 84750.5, as that section read on January 1, 2018, adjusted for annual changes in the cost-of-living adjustment identified in the annual Budget Act and adjusted for increases in FTES, or the amount computed pursuant to the funding formula established in this section.

(B) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, the San Francisco Community College District shall be entitled to restoration of any reduction in apportionment revenue due to decreases in FTES, up to the level of attendance of FTES funded in the 2012–13 fiscal year, if there is a
 subsequent increase in FTES.

(C) (i) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning in the fiscal year the Compton Community College District is accredited under the governing authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District, the board of governors shall provide allocations to the Compton Community College District in an amount not less than the total amount that the district would receive if the level of attendance of FTES was the same level of attendance as in the 2017–18 fiscal year. The amount shall be adjusted to reflect cost-of-living adjustments, deficits in apportionments, or both, as appropriate for the applicable fiscal years.

(ii) For purposes of computing the FTES attributable to this paragraph and subdivision (d), for seven fiscal years beginning
 in the fiscal year the Compton Community College District is accredited under the governing authority of the Board of Trustees of the Compton Community College District, the Compton Community College District shall be entitled to restoration of any reduction in apportionment revenue due to decreases in FTES, up to the level of attendance of FTES funded in the 2017–18 fiscal year, if there is a subsequent increase in FTES.
